Utah statutes.
75-2-504.   Self-proved will.
(1)  A will may be simultaneously executed, attested, and made self-proved, by
acknowledgment thereof by the testator and affidavits of the witnesses, each
made before an officer authorized to administer oaths under the laws of the
state in which execution occurs, whether or not that officer is also a witness
to the will, and evidenced by the officer's certificate, under official seal,
in substantially the following form:
I, _______, the testator, sign my name to this instrument this ____ day of
_______, and being first duly sworn, do hereby declare to the undersigned
authority that I sign and execute this instrument as my will and that I sign
it willingly (or willingly direct another to sign for me), that I execute it
as my free and voluntary act for the purposes therein expressed, and that I am
18 years of age or older, of sound mind, and under no constraint or undue
influence.
__________________
Testator
We, _______, _______, the witnesses, sign our names to this instrument, being
first duly sworn, and do hereby declare to the undersigned authority that the
testator signs and executes this instrument as [his] [her] will and that [he]
[she] signs it willingly (or willingly directs another to sign for [him] [her]
), and that each of us, in the presence and hearing of the testator, hereby
signs this will as witness to the testator's signing, and that to the best of
our knowledge the testator is 18 years of age or older, of sound mind, and
under no constraint or undue influence.
___________________
Witness
__________________
Witness
State of _______
County of _______
Subscribed, sworn to and acknowledged before me by _______, the testator, and
subscribed and sworn to before me by _______, and _______, witnesses, this
____ day of _______.
(Signed)   _______________
________________________
(Official capacity of officer)
(2)  An attested will may be made self-proved at any time after its execution
by the acknowledgment thereof by the testator and the affidavits of the
witnesses, each made before an officer authorized to administer oaths under
the laws of the state in which the acknowledgment occurs and evidenced by the
officer's certificate, under the official seal, attached or annexed to the
will in substantially the following form:
State of _______
County of _______
We, _______, _______, and _______, the testator and the witnesses,
respectively, whose names are signed to the attached or foregoing instrument,
being first duly sworn, do hereby declare to the undersigned authority that
the testator signed and executed the instrument as the testator's will and
that [he] [she] had signed willingly (or willingly directed another to sign
for [him] [her] ), and that [he] [she] executed it as [his] [her] free and
voluntary act for the purposes therein expressed, and that each of the
witnesses, in the presence and hearing of the testator, signed the will as
witness and that to the best of [his] [her] knowledge the testator was at that
time 18 years or age or older, of sound mind, and under no constraint or undue
influence.
__________________
Testator
__________________
Witness
__________________
Witness
Subscribed, sworn to, and acknowledged before me by _______, the testator, and
subscribed and sworn to before me by _______, and _______, witnesses, this
____ day of _______.
(Signed) ___________________
___________________________
(Official capacity of officer)
(3)  A signature affixed to a self-proving affidavit attached to a will is
considered a signature affixed to the will, if necessary to prove the will's
due execution.
(4)  The notarization of will provisions of this section preempt conflicting
provisions in other sections of the Utah Code whether the will was executed
prior to or after July 1, 1998.
